de: Kompatibilität mit Fußgewölbetypen: Senkfuß/Plattfuß; Hohlfuß; Flaches Fußgewölbe (Plattfüße); Normales Fußgewölbe (Neutrales Fußgewölbe); Universell (alle Fußgewölbehöhen); Sonstiges
zh-CN: 足弓类型适配性: 塌陷/扁平足弓; 高足弓; 低足弓（扁平足）; 中足弓（正常足弓）; 通用（所有足弓高度）; 其他
es: Compatibilidad con el tipo de arco del pie: Arco colapsado/plano; Arco alto; Arco bajo (pies planos); Arco medio (arco neutral); Universal (todas las alturas de arco); Otro
ru: Совместимость с типом свода стопы: Опущенный свод (плоскостопие); Высокий свод; Низкий свод (плоскостопие); Средний свод (нейтральный свод); Универсальный (любая высота свода); Другое
sv: Kompatibilitet mellan fotvalvstyper: Nedsjunket fotvalv/plattfot; Högt fotvalv; Lågt fotvalv (plattfot); Medelhögt fotvalv (neutralt fotvalv); Universell (alla valvhöjder); Övrigt
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea tipului de arc plantar: Boltă prăbușită/platfus; Boltă înaltă; Boltă joasă (picioare plate); Boltă medie (boltă neutră); Universal (toate tipurile de boltă); Altele
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของรูปทรงของอุ้งเท้า: เท้าแบน/อุ้งเท้าล้ม; อุ้งเท้าสูง; อุ้งเท้าต่ำ (เท้าแบน); อุ้งเท้าปานกลาง (อุ้งเท้าปกติ); อเนกประสงค์ (ใช้ได้กับอุ้งเท้าทุกระดับ); อื่นๆ
fr: Compatibilité avec le type de voûte plantaire: Voûte plantaire affaissée; Voûte plantaire haute; Voûte plantaire basse (pieds plats); Voûte plantaire moyenne (voûte neutre); Universel (toutes hauteurs de voûte); Autre
pt-BR: Compatibilidade com o tipo de arco do pé: Arco desabado/caído; Arco alto; Arco baixo (pé chato); Arco médio (arco neutro); Universal (todas as alturas de arco); Outra
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com o tipo de arco do pé: Arco abatido/caído; Arco alto; Arco baixo (pés chatos); Arco médio (arco neutro); Universal (todas as alturas de arco); Outro
tr: Ayak kemeri türü uyumluluğu: Düşük/düz taban; Yüksek taban; Düşük taban (düz taban); Orta taban (nötr taban); Evrensel (tüm taban yükseklikleri); Diğer
ja: 足のアーチタイプの互換性: 偏平足/アーチ崩れ; ハイアーチ; ローアーチ (扁平足); ミディアムアーチ (ニュートラルアーチ); ユニバーサル (すべてのアーチの高さに対応); その他
ko: 발 아치 유형 호환성: 무너진/낮은 아치; 하이 아치; 낮은 아치(평발); 중간 아치(일반 아치); 범용(모든 아치 높이); 기타
en: Foot arch type compatibility: Collapsed/fallen arch; High arch; Low arch (flat feet); Medium arch (neutral arch); Universal (all arch heights); Other
nb: Kompatibilitet med fotbuetyper: Nedsunket fotbue; Høy fotbue; Lav fotbue (plattfot); Middels fotbue (nøytral fotbue); Universell (alle fotbuehøyder); Annet
nl: Voetboogtype compatibiliteit: Doorgezakte voet/platvoet; Hoge voetboog; Lage voetboog (platvoeten); Gemiddelde voetboog (neutrale voetboog); Universeel (alle voetbooghoogtes); Overige
zh-TW: 足弓類型相容性: 足弓塌陷/扁平足; 高足弓; 低足弓 (扁平足); 中足弓 (正常足弓); 通用 (所有足弓高度); 其他
bg-BG: Съвместимост с тип свод на стъпалото: Спаднал свод; Висок свод; Нисък свод (плоскостъпие); Среден свод (неутрален свод); Универсална (за всички височини на свода); Друг
pl: Kompatybilność z typem łuku stopy: Opadający łuk stopy / płaskostopie; Wysokie podbicie; Niskie podbicie (płaskostopie); Średnie podbicie (neutralne); Uniwersalne (na każdą wysokość podbicia); Inne
vi: Khả năng tương thích với loại vòm bàn chân: Vòm chân sập/bẹt; Vòm cao; Vòm thấp (bàn chân bẹt); Vòm trung bình (vòm trung tính); Phổ biến (mọi độ cao vòm chân); Khác
lt-LT: Suderinamumas su pėdos skliauto tipu: Susilpnėjęs / plokščias skliautas; Aukštas skliautas; Žemas skliautas (plokščiapėdystė); Vidutinis skliautas (neutralus skliautas); Universalus (visiems skliauto aukščiams); Kita
sk-SK: Kompatibilita typu klenby chodidla: Znížená/plochá klenba; Vysoká klenba; Nízka klenba (ploché nohy); Stredná klenba (neutrálna klenba); Univerzálna (pre všetky výšky klenby); Iné
el: Συμβατότητα τύπου καμάρας ποδιού: Πεσμένη καμάρα / Πλατυποδία; Υψηλή καμάρα; Χαμηλή καμάρα (πλατυποδία); Μεσαία καμάρα (ουδέτερη καμάρα); Γενικής χρήσης (όλα τα ύψη καμάρας); Άλλο
cs: Kompatibilita typu klenby nohy: Zborcená/plochá klenba; Vysoká klenba; Nízká klenba (ploché nohy); Střední klenba (neutrální klenba); Univerzální (všechny výšky klenby); Jiné
sl-SI: Združljivost tipov stopalnega loka: Ploski stopalni lok; Visok stopalni lok; Nizek stopalni lok (ploska stopala); Srednji stopalni lok (nevtralni stopalni lok); Univerzalno (vse višine loka); Drugo
it: compatibilità del tipo di arco plantare: Arco plantare collassato/piatto; Arco plantare alto; Arco plantare basso (piedi piatti); Arco plantare medio (arco plantare neutro); Universale (tutte le altezze dell'arco plantare); Altro
hu: Lábboltozat típusú kompatibilitás: Lúdtalp / lesüllyedt boltozat; Magas boltozat; Alacsony boltozat (lúdtalp); Közepes boltozat (normál boltozat); Univerzális (minden boltozatmagassághoz); Egyéb
da: Kompatibilitet med fodsvangstype: Nedsunken svang/platfod; Høj svang; Lav svang (platfod); Medium svang (neutral svang); Universal (alle svanghøjder); Andet
fi: Jalkaholvityypin yhteensopivuus: Laskeutunut jalkaholvi; Korkea jalkaholvi; Matala jalkaholvi (lattajalat); Keskikorkea jalkaholvi (neutraali); Yleiskäyttöinen (kaikki holvikorkeudet); Muu
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost tipova svoda stopala: Spušteno svod; Visoki svod; Niski svod (ravna stopala); Srednji svod (neutralni svod); Univerzalno (za sve visine svoda); Ostalo